Massachusetts, session 194th, H2753.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary,
Chapter 32 Section 94B(2) of the General Laws as appearing in the 2014 Official Edition is
hereby amended by striking the word five in line 27 and insert the word ten after the word within
in line 27.
Section 2. Chapter 32 Section 94B (2) of the General Laws as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition is hereby amended by inserting in line 31 after the word compensation the
following words, in the event that such person retires in accordance with this section any
secondary cancer shall be covered in accordance with section 9 of this chapter.
of 1